Utah statutes.
67-1-4.   Records to be kept.
The governor must cause to be kept the following records:
(1)  An account of all his official expenses and disbursements, including the
incidental expenses of his department, and an account of all rewards offered
by him for the apprehension of criminals and persons charged with crime.
(2)  A register of all appointments made by him, with dates of commissions and
names of appointees and predecessors.
